Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-885.45
Acting without license or certificate; penalty.

Any person or subdivider acting as a broker, salesperson, or subdivider without having first obtained the required license or subdivision certificate or while his or her license or subdivision certificate is under suspension shall be guilty of a Class II misdemeanor.

Laws 1973, LB 68, § 45;

Laws 1975, LB 354, § 5;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 296;

Laws 1978, LB 361, § 12;

Laws 1985, LB 109, § 2;

Laws 2002, LB 863, § 24.